Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.037

Presumption of legal capacity.

For the purposes of this chapter, an adult is presumed to have legal capacity.

[ 2020 c 312 s 226.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.